Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-623
Society names and emblems; registration; fees.

The fees of the Secretary of State for registration, alteration, cancellation, searches made by him, and certificates issued by him, pursuant to sections 21-617 to 21-622, shall be as follows: One dollar and fifty cents for each registration, alteration, cancellation, search or reregistration; for the certificate contemplated in section 21-621, one dollar plus ten cents for each hundred words, or fraction thereof, set forth in said certificate issued. The fees collected under sections 21-617 to 21-624 shall be paid by the Secretary of State into the state treasury.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 7, p. 498;

C.S.1929, § 24-620;

R.S.1943, § 21-623.